Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-420
Hearing; required;
when; notice.

Before the adoption, amendment,
or repeal of any rule or regulation, the suspension, revocation, or cancellation
of any license or permit, or the levying of an administrative fine pursuant
to section 9-418, the department shall set the matter for hearing. Such suspension,
revocation, or cancellation proceedings or proceedings to levy an administrative
fine shall be considered contested cases pursuant to the Administrative Procedure
Act.

At least ten days before the hearing, the department shall
(1) in the case of suspension, revocation, or cancellation proceedings or
proceedings to levy an administrative fine, serve notice by personal service
or mail upon
the licensee, permittee, or violator of the time, date, and place of any hearing
or (2) in the case of adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule or regulation,
issue a public notice of the time, date, and place of such hearing.

This section shall not apply to an order of suspension by
the Tax Commissioner prior to a hearing as provided in section 9-419.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 141;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 49;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 103;

Laws 1995, LB 344, § 27;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 9.
April 12, 2012
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.